Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Care services" means any combination of services, including in-home care, private duty care, or private duty nursing designed for or with the goal of allowing vulnerable adults to receive care and related services at home or in a home-like setting. Care service providers must include home health agencies and in-home service agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

(2) "Client" means an elder person or a vulnerable adult, or his or her representative if any, seeking a referral or assistance with entering into an arrangement for supportive housing or care services in Washington state through an elder and vulnerable adult referral agency. For purposes of this chapter, the "client's representative" means the person authorized under RCW 7.70.065 or other laws to provide informed consent for an individual unable to do so. "Client" may also mean a person seeking a referral for supportive housing or care services on behalf of the elder person or vulnerable adult through an elder care referral service: PROVIDED, That such a person is a family member, relative, or domestic partner of the senior or vulnerable adult.

(3) "Elder and vulnerable adult referral agency" or "agency" means a business or person who receives a fee from or on behalf of a vulnerable adult seeking a referral to care services or supportive housing, or who receives a fee from a care services provider or supportive housing provider because of any referral provided to or on behalf of a vulnerable adult.

(4) "Fee" means anything of value. "Fee" includes money or other valuable consideration or services or the promise of money or other valuable consideration or services, received directly or indirectly by an elder and vulnerable adult referral agency.

(5) "Information" means the provision of general information by an agency to a person about the types of supportive housing or care services available in the area that may meet the needs of elderly or vulnerable adults without giving the person the names of specific providers of care services or supportive housing, or giving a provider the name of the person or vulnerable adult. Information also means the provision by an agency of the names of specific providers to a social worker, discharge planner, case manager, professional guardian, nurse, or other professional who is assisting a vulnerable adult locate supportive housing or care services, where the agency does not request or receive any fee.

(6) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, organization, service, office, or an agent or any of their employees.

(7) "Provider" means any entity or person that both provides supportive housing or care services to a vulnerable adult for a fee and provides or is required to provide such housing or services under a state or local business license specific to such housing or services.

(8) "Referral" means the act of an agency giving a client the name or names of specific providers of care services or supportive housing that may meet the needs of the vulnerable adult identified in the intake form described in RCW 18.330.060, or the agency gives a provider the name of a client for the purposes of enabling the provider to contact the client regarding care services or supportive housing provided by that provider.

(9) "Supportive housing" means any type of housing that includes services for care needs and is designed for prospective residents who are vulnerable adults. Supportive housing includes, but is not limited to, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, *boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW, and continuing care retirement communities under RCW 70.38.025.

(10) "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.34.020.

[ 2011 c 357 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "boarding home" was changed to "assisted living facility" by 2012 c 10.